Florida, session 2026, HB1009.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
56
57 Section 1. Section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, is amended
58 to read:
59 50.0311 Publication of advertisements and public notices
60 on a publicly accessible website and governmental access
61 channels.—
62 (1) For purposes of this chapter, the term "governmental
63 agency" means a county, municipality, school board, clerk of the
64 circuit court, tax collector, water management district
65 operating pursuant to chapter 373, or other unit of local
66 government or political subdivision in this state.
67 (2) For purposes of notices and advertisements required
68 under s. 50.011, the term "publicly accessible website" means a
69 county's official website or other private website designated by
70 the county for the publication of legal notices and
71 advertisements which that is accessible through via the
72 Internet. For legal notices and advertisements required under s.
73 50.011 by a municipality, clerk of the circuit court, tax
74 collector, water management district, or other unit of local
75 government, the term "publicly accessible website" means such
Page 3 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
76 entity's official website, a private website designated by such
77 entity, a county's official website, or a private website
78 designated by the county in which such entity is located.
79 (3) All advertisements and public notices published on a
80 website as provided in this chapter must be in searchable form
81 and indicate the date on which the advertisement or public
82 notice was first published on the website.
83 (4) Any legal notice or advertisement that is published on
84 a publicly accessible website must, unless otherwise specified
85 by law, be published continuously for at least 2 weeks when the
86 purpose is to provide notice of the status of a government
87 activity or be published continuously from the date of initial
88 publication through the date of the proposed event or activity.
89 (5)(3) A governmental agency may use the publicly
90 accessible website of the county in which it lies to publish
91 legally required advertisements and public notices if the cost
92 of publishing advertisements and public notices on such website
93 is less than the cost of publishing advertisements and public
94 notices in a newspaper.
95 (6)(4) A governmental agency with at least 75 percent of
96 its population located within a county having with a population
97 of less fewer than 160,000; a municipality, school board, clerk
98 of the circuit court, or tax collector that is located within a
99 county having a population of less than 160,000; or any other
100 unit of local government or political subdivision in this state
Page 4 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
101 having at least 75 percent of its population located within a
102 county having a population of less than 160,000 may use a
103 publicly accessible website to publish legally required
104 advertisements and public notices only if the governing body of
105 the governmental agency, at a public hearing that has been
106 noticed in a newspaper as provided in this chapter, determines
107 that the residents of the governmental agency have sufficient
108 access to the Internet by broadband service, as defined in s.
109 364.02, or by any other means, such that publishing
110 advertisements and public notices on a publicly accessible
111 website will not unreasonably restrict public access.
112 (7)(5) A special district spanning the geographic
113 boundaries of more than one county that satisfies the criteria
114 for publishing and publishes chooses to publish legally required
115 advertisements and public notices on a publicly accessible
116 website must publish such advertisements and public notices on
117 the publicly accessible website of each county it spans. For
118 purposes of this subsection, the term "special district" has the
119 same meaning as in s. 189.012 but does not include a water
120 management district operating pursuant to chapter 373.
121 (8)(6) A governmental agency that uses a publicly
122 accessible website to publish legally required advertisements
123 and public notices must shall provide notice at least once per
124 year in a newspaper of general circulation or another
125 publication that is mailed or delivered to all residents and
Page 5 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
126 property owners throughout the government's jurisdiction,
127 indicating that property owners and residents may receive
128 legally required advertisements and public notices from the
129 governmental agency by first-class mail or e-mail upon
130 registering their name and address or e-mail address with the
131 governmental agency. The governmental agency must shall maintain
132 a registry of names, addresses, and e-mail addresses of property
133 owners and residents who have requested in writing that they
134 receive legally required advertisements and public notices from
135 the governmental agency by first-class mail or e-mail.
136 (9)(7) A link to advertisements and public notices
137 published on a publicly accessible website must shall be
138 conspicuously placed:
139 (a) On the website's homepage or on a page accessible
140 through a direct link from the homepage.
141 (b) On the homepage of the website of each governmental
142 agency publishing notices on the publicly accessible website or
143 on a page accessible through a direct link from the homepage.
144 (10) A public bid advertisement made by a governmental
145 agency or special governmental agency on a publicly accessible
146 website must be provided and accessible to the general public
147 without charge.
148 (11)(8) A governmental agency that has a governmental
149 access channel authorized under s. 610.109 may also include on
150 its governmental access channel a summary of all advertisements
Page 6 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
151 and public notices that are published on a publicly accessible
152 website.
153 (12)(9) A public bid advertisement made by a governmental
154 agency on a publicly accessible website must include a method to
155 accept electronic bids.
156 Section 2. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
157 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
158 reference thereto, section 11.02, Florida Statutes, is reenacted
159 to read:
160 11.02 Notice of special or local legislation or certain
161 relief acts.—The notice required to obtain special or local
162 legislation or any relief act specified in s. 11.065 shall be by
163 publishing the identical notice as provided in chapter 50 or
164 circulated throughout the county or counties where the matter or
165 thing to be affected by such legislation shall be situated one
166 time at least 30 days before introduction of the proposed law
167 into the Legislature or, if the notice is not published on a
168 publicly accessible website as provided in s. 50.0311 and there
169 is no newspaper circulated throughout or published in the
170 county, by posting for at least 30 days at not fewer than three
171 public places in the county or each of the counties, one of
172 which places shall be at the courthouse in the county or
173 counties where the matter or thing to be affected by such
174 legislation shall be situated. Notice of special or local
175 legislation shall state the substance of the contemplated law,
Page 7 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
176 as required by s. 10, Art. III of the State Constitution. Notice
177 of any relief act specified in s. 11.065 shall state the name of
178 the claimant, the nature of the injury or loss for which the
179 claim is made, and the amount of the claim against the affected
180 municipality's revenue-sharing trust fund.
181 Section 3. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
182 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
183 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 45.031, Florida
184 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
185 45.031 Judicial sales procedure.—In any sale of real or
186 personal property under an order or judgment, the procedures
187 provided in this section and ss. 45.0315-45.035 may be followed
188 as an alternative to any other sale procedure if so ordered by
189 the court.
190 (2) PUBLICATION OF SALE.—Notice of sale shall be published
191 on a publicly accessible website as provided in s. 50.0311 for
192 at least 2 consecutive weeks before the sale or once a week for
193 2 consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation, as
194 provided in chapter 50, published in the county where the sale
195 is to be held. The second publication by newspaper shall be at
196 least 5 days before the sale. The notice shall contain:
197 (a) A description of the property to be sold.
198 (b) The time and place of sale.
199 (c) A statement that the sale will be made pursuant to the
200 order or final judgment.
Page 8 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
201 (d) The caption of the action.
202 (e) The name of the clerk making the sale.
203 (f) A statement that any person claiming an interest in
204 the surplus from the sale, if any, other than the property owner
205 as of the date of the lis pendens must file a claim before the
206 clerk reports the surplus as unclaimed.
207
208 The court, in its discretion, may enlarge the time of the sale.
209 Notice of the changed time of sale shall be published as
210 provided herein.
211 Section 4. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
212 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
213 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 50.011, Florida
214 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
215 50.011 Publication of legal notices.—Whenever by statute
216 an official or legal advertisement or a publication or notice in
217 a newspaper or on a governmental agency website has been or is
218 directed or permitted in the nature of or in lieu of process, or
219 for constructive service, or in initiating, assuming, reviewing,
220 exercising, or enforcing jurisdiction or power, or for any
221 purpose, including all legal notices and advertisements of
222 sheriffs and tax collectors, such legislation, whether existing
223 or repealed, means either of the following:
224 (2) A publication on a publicly accessible website under
225 s. 50.0311.
Page 9 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
226 Section 5. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
227 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
228 reference thereto, section 50.021, Florida Statutes, is
229 reenacted to read:
230 50.021 Publication when no newspaper in county.—When any
231 law, or order or decree of court, directs advertisements to be
232 made in a county and there is no newspaper published in the
233 county, the advertisement may be published on a publicly
234 accessible website as provided in s. 50.0311 or made by posting
235 three copies thereof in three different places in the county,
236 one of which shall be at the front door of the courthouse, and
237 by publication in the nearest county in which a newspaper
238 qualified under this chapter is published.
239 Section 6. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
240 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
241 reference thereto, subsection (3) of section 50.0211, Florida
242 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
243 50.0211 Internet website publication.—
244 (3)(a) If a legal notice is published in the print edition
245 of a newspaper, the newspaper publishing the notice shall place
246 the notice on the statewide website established and maintained
247 as an initiative of the Florida Press Association as a
248 repository for such notices located at the following address:
249 www.floridapublicnotices.com.
250 (b) A legal notice placed on the statewide website created
Page 10 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
251 under this subsection must be:
252 1. Accessible and searchable by party name and case
253 number.
254 2. Published for a period of at least 90 consecutive days
255 after the first day of publication.
256 (c) The statewide website created under this subsection
257 shall maintain a searchable archive of all legal notices
258 published on the publicly accessible website for 18 months after
259 the first day of publication. Such searchable archive shall be
260 provided and accessible to the general public without charge.
261 Section 7. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
262 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
263 reference thereto, section 50.031, Florida Statutes, is
264 reenacted to read:
265 50.031 Newspapers in which legal notices and process may
266 be published.—If a governmental agency publishes a legal notice
267 in a newspaper, no notice or publication required to be
268 published in the nature of or in lieu of process of any kind,
269 nature, character, or description provided for under any law of
270 the state, whether heretofore or hereafter enacted, and whether
271 pertaining to constructive service, or the initiating, assuming,
272 reviewing, exercising, or enforcing jurisdiction or power, by
273 any court in this state, or any notice of sale of property, real
274 or personal, for taxes, state, county, or municipal, or
275 sheriff's, guardian's, or administrator's or any sale made
Page 11 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
276 pursuant to any judicial order, decree, or statute or any other
277 publication or notice pertaining to any affairs of the state, or
278 any county, municipality, or other political subdivision
279 thereof, shall be deemed to have been published in accordance
280 with the statutes providing for such publication, unless the
281 same shall have been published for the prescribed period of time
282 required for such publication, in a newspaper which at the time
283 of such publication shall have been in existence for 2 years and
284 meets the requirements set forth in s. 50.011, or in a newspaper
285 which is a direct successor of a newspaper which has been so
286 published; provided, however, that nothing herein contained
287 shall apply where in any county there shall be no newspaper in
288 existence which shall have been published for the length of time
289 above prescribed. No legal publication of any kind, nature, or
290 description, as herein defined, shall be valid or binding or
291 held to be in compliance with the statutes providing for such
292 publication unless the same shall have been published in
293 accordance with this section or s. 50.0311. Proof of such
294 publication shall be made by uniform affidavit.
295 Section 8. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
296 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
297 reference thereto, section 50.051, Florida Statutes, is
298 reenacted to read:
299 50.051 Proof of publication; form of uniform affidavit.—
300 The printed form upon which all such affidavits establishing
Page 12 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
301 proof of publication are to be executed shall be substantially
302 as follows:
303 NAME OF COUNTY
304 STATE OF FLORIDA
305 COUNTY OF ....
306 Before the undersigned authority personally appeared ....,
307 who on oath says that he or she is .... of .... County, Florida;
308 that the attached copy of advertisement, being a .... in the
309 matter of .... in the .... Court, was published on the publicly
310 accessible website of .... County, Florida, or in a newspaper by
311 print in the issues of .... on ...(date)....
312 Affiant further says that the website or newspaper complies
313 with all legal requirements for publication in chapter 50,
314 Florida Statutes.
315 Sworn to and subscribed before me this .... day of ....,
316 ...(year)..., by ...., who is personally known to me or who has
317 produced ...(type of identification)... as identification.
318 ...(Signature of Notary Public)...
319 ...(Print, Type, or Stamp Commissioned Name of Notary Public)...
320 ...(Notary Public)...
321 Section 9. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
322 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
323 reference thereto, subsection (4) of section 50.061, Florida
324 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
325 50.061 Amounts chargeable.—
Page 13 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
326 (4) A governmental agency publishing an official public
327 notice or legal advertisement may procure publication by
328 soliciting and accepting written bids from newspapers published
329 in the county, in which case the specified charges in this
330 section do not apply.
331 Section 10. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
332 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
333 reference thereto, subsections (1), (3), and (4) of section
334 50.0711, Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read:
335 50.0711 Court docket fund; service charges; publications.—
336 (1) The clerk of the court in each county may establish a
337 court docket fund for the purpose of paying the cost of
338 publication of the fact of the filing of any civil case in the
339 circuit court of the county by the style and of the calendar
340 relating to such cases. This court docket fund shall be funded
341 by $1 mandatory court cost for all civil actions, suits, or
342 proceedings filed in the circuit court of the county. The clerk
343 shall maintain such funds separate and apart, and the proceeds
344 from this court cost shall not be diverted to any other fund or
345 for any purpose other than that established in this section. The
346 clerk of the court shall dispense the fund to the designated
347 publicly accessible website publisher or record newspaper in the
348 county on a quarterly basis.
349 (3) The publicly accessible website publisher or
350 publishers of any designated record newspapers receiving payment
Page 14 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
351 from this court docket fund shall publish, without additional
352 charge, the fact of the filing of any civil case, suit, or
353 action filed in such county in the circuit. Such publication
354 shall be in accordance with a schedule agreed upon between the
355 website publisher or record newspaper and the clerk of the court
356 in such county.
357 (4) The publicly accessible website publisher or
358 publishers of any designated record newspapers receiving
359 revenues from the court docket fund established in subsection
360 (1) shall, without charge, accept legal advertisements for the
361 purpose of service of process by publication under s. 49.011(4),
362 (10), and (11) when such publication is required of persons
363 authorized to proceed as indigent persons under s. 57.081.
364 Section 11. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
365 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
366 reference thereto, subsection (9) of section 69.081, Florida
367 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
368 69.081 Sunshine in litigation; concealment of public
369 hazards prohibited.—
370 (9) A governmental entity, except a municipality or
371 county, that settles a claim in tort which requires the
372 expenditure of public funds in excess of $5,000, shall provide
373 notice, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 50, of such
374 settlement, in the county in which the claim arose, within 60
375 days of entering into such settlement; provided that no notice
Page 15 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
376 shall be required if the settlement has been approved by a court
377 of competent jurisdiction.
378 Section 12. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
379 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
380 reference thereto, subsection (12) of section 90.902, Florida
381 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
382 90.902 Self-authentication.—Extrinsic evidence of
383 authenticity as a condition precedent to admissibility is not
384 required for:
385 (12) A legal notice published in accordance with the
386 requirements of chapter 50 in the print edition of a qualified
387 newspaper or on a publicly accessible website as provided in s.
388 50.0311.
389 Section 13. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
390 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
391 reference thereto, paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of section
392 120.81, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
393 120.81 Exceptions and special requirements; general
394 areas.—
395 (1) EDUCATIONAL UNITS.—
396 (d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter,
397 educational units shall not be required to include the full text
398 of the rule or rule amendment in notices relating to rules and
399 need not publish these or other notices in the Florida
400 Administrative Register, but notice shall be made:
Page 16 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
401 1. By publication in a newspaper qualified under chapter
402 50 in the affected area or on a publicly accessible website as
403 provided in s. 50.0311;
404 2. By mail to all persons who have made requests of the
405 educational unit for advance notice of its proceedings and to
406 organizations representing persons affected by the proposed
407 rule; and
408 3. By posting in appropriate places so that those
409 particular classes of persons to whom the intended action is
410 directed may be duly notified.
411 Section 14. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
412 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
413 reference thereto, paragraphs (b) and (h) of subsection (1) of
414 section 121.055, Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read:
415 121.055 Senior Management Service Class.—There is hereby
416 established a separate class of membership within the Florida
417 Retirement System to be known as the "Senior Management Service
418 Class," which shall become effective February 1, 1987.
419 (1)
420 (b)1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2., effective
421 January 1, 1990, participation in the Senior Management Service
422 Class is compulsory for the president of each community college,
423 the manager of each participating municipality or county, and
424 all appointed district school superintendents. Effective January
425 1, 1994, additional positions may be designated for inclusion in
Page 17 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
426 the Senior Management Service Class if:
427 a. Positions to be included in the class are designated by
428 the local agency employer. Notice of intent to designate
429 positions for inclusion in the class must be published for at
430 least 2 consecutive weeks if published on a publicly accessible
431 website as provided in s. 50.0311 or, if published in print,
432 once a week for 2 consecutive weeks in a newspaper qualified
433 under chapter 50 that is published in the county or counties
434 affected.
435 b. Up to 10 nonelective full-time positions may be
436 designated for each local agency employer reporting to the
437 department; for local agencies with 100 or more regularly
438 established positions, additional nonelective full-time
439 positions may be designated, not to exceed 1 percent of the
440 regularly established positions within the agency.
441 c. Each position added to the class must be a managerial
442 or policymaking position filled by an employee who is not
443 subject to continuing contract and serves at the pleasure of the
444 local agency employer without civil service protection, and who:
445 (I) Heads an organizational unit; or
446 (II) Has responsibility to effect or recommend personnel,
447 budget, expenditure, or policy decisions in his or her areas of
448 responsibility.
449 2. In lieu of participation in the Senior Management
450 Service Class, members of the Senior Management Service Class,
Page 18 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
451 pursuant to subparagraph 1., may withdraw from the Florida
452 Retirement System altogether. The decision to withdraw from the
453 system is irrevocable as long as the employee holds the
454 position. Any service creditable under the Senior Management
455 Service Class shall be retained after the member withdraws from
456 the system; however, additional service credit in the Senior
457 Management Service Class may not be earned after such
458 withdrawal. Such members are not eligible to participate in the
459 Senior Management Service Optional Annuity Program.
460 3. Effective January 1, 2006, through June 30, 2006, an
461 employee who has withdrawn from the Florida Retirement System
462 under subparagraph 2. has one opportunity to elect to
463 participate in the pension plan or the investment plan.
464 a. If the employee elects to participate in the investment
465 plan, membership shall be prospective, and the applicable
466 provisions of s. 121.4501(4) govern the election.
467 b. If the employee elects to participate in the pension
468 plan, the employee shall, upon payment to the system trust fund
469 of the amount calculated under sub-sub-subparagraph (I), receive
470 service credit for prior service based upon the time during
471 which the employee had withdrawn from the system.
472 (I) The cost for such credit shall be an amount
473 representing the actuarial accrued liability for the affected
474 period of service. The cost shall be calculated using the
475 discount rate and other relevant actuarial assumptions that were
Page 19 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
476 used to value the pension plan liabilities in the most recent
477 actuarial valuation. The calculation must include any service
478 already maintained under the pension plan in addition to the
479 period of withdrawal. The actuarial accrued liability
480 attributable to any service already maintained under the pension
481 plan shall be applied as a credit to the total cost resulting
482 from the calculation. The division must ensure that the transfer
483 sum is prepared using a formula and methodology certified by an
484 actuary.
485 (II) The employee must transfer a sum representing the net
486 cost owed for the actuarial accrued liability in sub-sub-
487 subparagraph (I) immediately following the time of such
488 movement, determined assuming that attained service equals the
489 sum of service in the pension plan and the period of withdrawal.
490 (h)1. Except as provided in subparagraph 3., effective
491 January 1, 1994, participation in the Senior Management Service
492 Class shall be compulsory for the State Courts Administrator and
493 the Deputy State Courts Administrators, the Clerk of the Supreme
494 Court, the Marshal of the Supreme Court, the Executive Director
495 of the Justice Administrative Commission, the capital collateral
496 regional counsel, the clerks of the district courts of appeals,
497 the marshals of the district courts of appeals, and the trial
498 court administrator and the Chief Deputy Court Administrator in
499 each judicial circuit. Effective January 1, 1994, additional
500 positions in the offices of the state attorney and public
Page 20 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
501 defender in each judicial circuit may be designated for
502 inclusion in the Senior Management Service Class of the Florida
503 Retirement System, provided that:
504 a. Positions to be included in the class shall be
505 designated by the state attorney or public defender, as
506 appropriate. Notice of intent to designate positions for
507 inclusion in the class shall be published for at least 2
508 consecutive weeks on a publicly accessible website as provided
509 in s. 50.0311 or, if published in print, once a week for 2
510 consecutive weeks in a newspaper qualified under chapter 50 in
511 the county or counties affected.
512 b. One nonelective full-time position may be designated
513 for each state attorney and public defender reporting to the
514 Department of Management Services; for agencies with 200 or more
515 regularly established positions under the state attorney or
516 public defender, additional nonelective full-time positions may
517 be designated, not to exceed 0.5 percent of the regularly
518 established positions within the agency.
519 c. Each position added to the class must be a managerial
520 or policymaking position filled by an employee who serves at the
521 pleasure of the state attorney or public defender without civil
522 service protection, and who:
523 (I) Heads an organizational unit; or
524 (II) Has responsibility to effect or recommend personnel,
525 budget, expenditure, or policy decisions in his or her areas of
Page 21 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
526 responsibility.
527 2. Participation in this class shall be compulsory, except
528 as provided in subparagraph 3., for any judicial employee who
529 holds a position designated for coverage in the Senior
530 Management Service Class, and such participation shall continue
531 until the employee terminates employment in a covered position.
532 Effective January 1, 2001, participation in this class is
533 compulsory for assistant state attorneys, assistant statewide
534 prosecutors, assistant public defenders, and assistant capital
535 collateral regional counsel. Effective January 1, 2002,
536 participation in this class is compulsory for assistant
537 attorneys general.
538 3. In lieu of participation in the Senior Management
539 Service Class, such members, excluding assistant state
540 attorneys, assistant public defenders, assistant statewide
541 prosecutors, assistant attorneys general, and assistant capital
542 collateral regional counsel, may participate in the Senior
543 Management Service Optional Annuity Program as established in
544 subsection (6).
545 Section 15. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
546 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
547 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
548 125.66, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
549 125.66 Ordinances; enactment procedure; emergency
550 ordinances; rezoning or change of land use ordinances or
Page 22 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
551 resolutions.—
552 (2)(a) The regular enactment procedure is as follows: The
553 board of county commissioners at any regular or special meeting
554 may enact or amend any ordinance, except as provided in
555 subsection (5), if notice of intent to consider such ordinance
556 is given at least 10 days before such meeting by publication as
557 provided in chapter 50. A copy of such notice must be kept
558 available for public inspection during the regular business
559 hours of the office of the clerk of the board of county
560 commissioners. The notice of proposed enactment must state the
561 date, time, and place of the meeting; the title or titles of
562 proposed ordinances; and the place or places within the county
563 where such proposed ordinances may be inspected by the public.
564 The notice must also advise that interested parties may appear
565 at the meeting and be heard with respect to the proposed
566 ordinance.
567 Section 16. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
568 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
569 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
570 162.12, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
571 162.12 Notices.—
572 (2) In addition to providing notice as set forth in
573 subsection (1), at the option of the code enforcement board or
574 the local government, notice may be served by publication or
575 posting, as follows:
Page 23 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
576 (a)1. Such notice shall be published in print in a
577 newspaper or on a publicly accessible website as provided in s.
578 50.0311 for 4 consecutive weeks. If published in print, the
579 notice shall be published once during each week for 4
580 consecutive weeks (four publications being sufficient) in a
581 newspaper in the county where the code enforcement board is
582 located. The newspaper shall meet such requirements as are
583 prescribed under chapter 50 for legal and official
584 advertisements.
585 2. Proof of publication shall be made as provided in ss.
586 50.041 and 50.051.
587 Section 17. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
588 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
589 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 189.015, Florida
590 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
591 189.015 Meetings; notice; required reports.—
592 (1) The governing body of each special district shall file
593 quarterly, semiannually, or annually a schedule of its regular
594 meetings with the local governing authority or authorities. The
595 schedule shall include the date, time, and location of each
596 scheduled meeting. The schedule shall be published quarterly,
597 semiannually, or annually in the manner required in this
598 subsection. The governing body of an independent special
599 district shall advertise the day, time, place, and purpose of
600 any meeting other than a regular meeting or any recessed and
Page 24 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
601 reconvened meeting of the governing body, at least 7 days before
602 such meeting as provided in chapter 50 in the county or counties
603 in which the special district is located, unless a bona fide
604 emergency situation exists, in which case a meeting to deal with
605 the emergency may be held as necessary, with reasonable notice,
606 so long as it is subsequently ratified by the governing body. No
607 approval of the annual budget shall be granted at an emergency
608 meeting. The notice shall be posted as provided in chapter 50.
609 Any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, and
610 except in the case of emergency meetings, water management
611 districts may provide reasonable notice of public meetings held
612 to evaluate responses to solicitations issued by the water
613 management district, as provided in chapter 50 by publication on
614 a publicly accessible website or by publication in a newspaper
615 in the county where the principal office of the water management
616 district is located, or in the county or counties where the
617 public work will be performed, no fewer than 7 days before such
618 meeting.
619 Section 18. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
620 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
621 reference thereto, paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of section
622 190.005, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
623 190.005 Establishment of district.—
624 (1) The exclusive and uniform method for the establishment
625 of a community development district with a size of 2,500 acres
Page 25 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
626 or more shall be pursuant to a rule, adopted under chapter 120
627 by the Florida Land and Water Adjudicatory Commission, granting
628 a petition for the establishment of a community development
629 district.
630 (d) A local public hearing on the petition shall be
631 conducted by a hearing officer in conformance with the
632 applicable requirements and procedures of the Administrative
633 Procedure Act. The hearing shall include oral and written
634 comments on the petition pertinent to the factors specified in
635 paragraph (e). The hearing shall be held at an accessible
636 location in the county in which the community development
637 district is to be located. The petitioner shall cause a notice
638 of the hearing to be published for 4 successive weeks on a
639 publicly accessible website as provided in s. 50.0311 or, if
640 published in print, in a newspaper at least once a week for the
641 4 successive weeks immediately prior to the hearing as provided
642 in chapter 50. Such notice shall give the time and place for the
643 hearing, a description of the area to be included in the
644 district, which description shall include a map showing clearly
645 the area to be covered by the district, and any other relevant
646 information which the establishing governing bodies may require.
647 If published in the print edition of a newspaper, the
648 advertisement may not be placed in the portion of the newspaper
649 where legal notices and classified advertisements appear. The
650 advertisement must be published in a newspaper in the county and
Page 26 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
651 of general interest and readership in the community pursuant to
652 chapter 50. Whenever possible, the advertisement shall appear in
653 a newspaper that is published at least weekly, unless the only
654 newspaper in the community is published less than weekly. If the
655 notice is published in the print edition of the newspaper, the
656 map must also be included in any online advertisement pursuant
657 to s. 50.0211. All affected units of general-purpose local
658 government and the general public shall be given an opportunity
659 to appear at the hearing and present oral or written comments on
660 the petition.
661 Section 19. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
662 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
663 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 197.402, Florida
664 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
665 197.402 Advertisement of real or personal property with
666 delinquent taxes.—
667 (1) If advertisements are required, the board of county
668 commissioners shall make such notice as provided in chapter 50.
669 The tax collector shall pay all charges, and the proportionate
670 cost of the advertisements shall be added to the delinquent
671 taxes collected.
672 Section 20. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
673 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
674 reference thereto, paragraph (f) of subsection (2) of section
675 200.065, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
Page 27 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
676 200.065 Method of fixing millage.—
677 (2) No millage shall be levied until a resolution or
678 ordinance has been approved by the governing board of the taxing
679 authority which resolution or ordinance must be approved by the
680 taxing authority according to the following procedure:
681 (f)1. Notwithstanding any provisions of paragraph (c) to
682 the contrary, each school district shall advertise its intent to
683 adopt a tentative budget on a publicly accessible website
684 pursuant to s. 50.0311 or in a newspaper of general circulation
685 pursuant to subsection (3) within 29 days after certification of
686 value pursuant to subsection (1). For the purpose of this
687 paragraph, the term "publicly accessible website" includes a
688 district school board's official website if the school board
689 website satisfies the remaining requirements of s. 50.0311. Not
690 less than 2 days or more than 5 days thereafter, the district
691 shall hold a public hearing on the tentative budget pursuant to
692 the applicable provisions of paragraph (c). In the event of
693 postponement or recess due to a declared state of emergency, the
694 school district may postpone or recess the hearing for up to 7
695 days and shall post a prominent notice at the place of the
696 original hearing showing the date, time, and place where the
697 hearing will be reconvened. The posted notice shall measure not
698 less than 8.5 by 11 inches. The school district shall make every
699 reasonable effort to provide reasonable notification of the
700 continued hearing to the taxpayers. The information must also be
Page 28 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
701 posted on the school district's website if the district school
702 board uses a different method of advertisement.
703 2. Notwithstanding any provisions of paragraph (b) to the
704 contrary, each school district shall advise the property
705 appraiser of its recomputed proposed millage rate within 35 days
706 of certification of value pursuant to subsection (1). The
707 recomputed proposed millage rate of the school district shall be
708 considered its proposed millage rate for the purposes of
709 paragraph (b).
710 3. Notwithstanding any provisions of paragraph (d) to the
711 contrary, each school district shall hold a public hearing to
712 finalize the budget and adopt a millage rate within 80 days of
713 certification of value pursuant to subsection (1), but not
714 earlier than 65 days after certification. The hearing shall be
715 held in accordance with the applicable provisions of paragraph
716 (d), except that a newspaper advertisement need not precede the
717 hearing.
718 Section 21. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
719 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
720 reference thereto, paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of section
721 338.223, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
722 338.223 Proposed turnpike projects.—
723 (1)
724 (c) Prior to requesting legislative approval of a proposed
725 turnpike project, the environmental feasibility of the proposed
Page 29 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
726 project shall be reviewed by the Department of Environmental
727 Protection. The department shall submit its Project Development
728 and Environmental Report to the Department of Environmental
729 Protection, along with a draft copy of a public notice. Within
730 14 days of receipt of the draft public notice, the Department of
731 Environmental Protection shall return the draft public notice to
732 the Department of Transportation with an approval of the
733 language or modifications to the language. Upon receipt of the
734 approved or modified draft, or if no comments are provided
735 within 14 days, the Department of Transportation shall publish
736 the notice as provided in chapter 50 to provide a 30-day public
737 comment period. If published in the print edition of a
738 newspaper, the headline of the required notice shall be in a
739 type no smaller than 18 point, shall be placed in that portion
740 of the newspaper where legal notices appear, and shall be
741 published in a newspaper qualified to publish legal notices in
742 the county or counties of general interest and readership in the
743 community as provided in s. 50.031. Whenever possible, the
744 notice shall appear in a newspaper that is published at least
745 weekly. All notices published pursuant to this section shall
746 include, at a minimum, the following information:
747 1. The purpose of the notice is to provide for a 30-day
748 period for written public comments on the environmental impacts
749 of a proposed turnpike project.
750 2. The name and description of the project, along with a
Page 30 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
751 geographic location map clearly indicating the area where the
752 proposed project will be located.
753 3. The address where such comments must be sent and the
754 date such comments are due.
755
756 After a review of the department's report and any public
757 comments, the Department of Environmental Protection shall
758 submit a statement of environmental feasibility to the
759 department within 30 days after the date on which public
760 comments are due. The notice and the statement of environmental
761 feasibility shall not give rise to any rights to a hearing or
762 other rights or remedies provided pursuant to chapter 120 or
763 chapter 403, and shall not bind the Department of Environmental
764 Protection in any subsequent environmental permit review.
765 Section 22. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
766 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
767 reference thereto, subsection (3) of section 348.0308, Florida
768 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
769 348.0308 Public-private partnership.—The Legislature
770 declares that there is a public need for the rapid construction
771 of safe and efficient transportation facilities for traveling
772 within the state and that it is in the public's interest to
773 provide for public-private partnership agreements to effectuate
774 the construction of additional safe, convenient, and economical
775 transportation facilities.
Page 31 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
776 (3) The agency may request proposals for public-private
777 transportation projects or, if it receives an unsolicited
778 proposal, it must publish a notice in the Florida Administrative
779 Register and, as provided in chapter 50, on a publicly
780 accessible website or by print in a newspaper qualified to
781 publish legal notices in the county in which the project is
782 located at least once a week for 2 weeks stating that it has
783 received the proposal and will accept, for 60 days after the
784 initial date of publication, other proposals for the same
785 project purpose. A copy of the notice must be mailed to each
786 local government in the affected areas. After the public
787 notification period has expired, the agency shall rank the
788 proposals in order of preference. In ranking the proposals, the
789 agency shall consider professional qualifications, general
790 business terms, innovative engineering or cost-reduction terms,
791 finance plans, and the need for state funds to deliver the
792 proposal. If the agency is not satisfied with the results of the
793 negotiations, it may, at its sole discretion, terminate
794 negotiations with the proposer. If these negotiations are
795 unsuccessful, the agency may go to the second and lower-ranked
796 firms, in order, using the same procedure. If only one proposal
797 is received, the agency may negotiate in good faith, and if it
798 is not satisfied with the results, it may, at its sole
799 discretion, terminate negotiations with the proposer. The agency
800 may, at its discretion, reject all proposals at any point in the
Page 32 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
801 process up to completion of a contract with the proposer.
802 Section 23. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
803 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
804 reference thereto, subsection (3) of section 348.635, Florida
805 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
806 348.635 Public-private partnership.—The Legislature
807 declares that there is a public need for the rapid construction
808 of safe and efficient transportation facilities for traveling
809 within the state and that it is in the public's interest to
810 provide for public-private partnership agreements to effectuate
811 the construction of additional safe, convenient, and economical
812 transportation facilities.
813 (3) The authority may request proposals for public-private
814 transportation projects or, if it receives an unsolicited
815 proposal, it must publish a notice in the Florida Administrative
816 Register and, as provided in chapter 50, on a publicly
817 accessible website or by print in a newspaper in the county in
818 which the project is located at least once a week for 2 weeks
819 stating that it has received the proposal and will accept, for
820 60 days after the initial date of publication, other proposals
821 for the same project purpose. A copy of the notice must be
822 mailed to each local government in the affected areas. After the
823 public notification period has expired, the authority shall rank
824 the proposals in order of preference. In ranking the proposals,
825 the authority shall consider professional qualifications,
Page 33 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
826 general business terms, innovative engineering or cost-reduction
827 terms, finance plans, and the need for state funds to deliver
828 the proposal. If the authority is not satisfied with the results
829 of the negotiations, it may, at its sole discretion, terminate
830 negotiations with the proposer. If these negotiations are
831 unsuccessful, the authority may go to the second and lower-
832 ranked firms, in order, using the same procedure. If only one
833 proposal is received, the authority may negotiate in good faith,
834 and if it is not satisfied with the results, it may, at its sole
835 discretion, terminate negotiations with the proposer. The
836 authority may, at its discretion, reject all proposals at any
837 point in the process up to completion of a contract with the
838 proposer.
839 Section 24. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
840 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
841 reference thereto, subsection (3) of section 348.7605, Florida
842 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
843 348.7605 Public-private partnership.—The Legislature
844 declares that there is a public need for the rapid construction
845 of safe and efficient transportation facilities for traveling
846 within the state and that it is in the public's interest to
847 provide for public-private partnership agreements to effectuate
848 the construction of additional safe, convenient, and economical
849 transportation facilities.
850 (3) The authority may request proposals for public-private
Page 34 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
851 transportation projects or, if it receives an unsolicited
852 proposal, it must publish a notice in the Florida Administrative
853 Register and, as provided in chapter 50, on a publicly
854 accessible website or by print in a newspaper in the county in
855 which the project is located at least once a week for 2 weeks
856 stating that it has received the proposal and will accept, for
857 60 days after the initial date of publication, other proposals
858 for the same project purpose. A copy of the notice must be
859 mailed to each local government in the affected areas. After the
860 public notification period has expired, the authority shall rank
861 the proposals in order of preference. In ranking the proposals,
862 the authority shall consider professional qualifications,
863 general business terms, innovative engineering or cost-reduction
864 terms, finance plans, and the need for state funds to deliver
865 the proposal. If the authority is not satisfied with the results
866 of the negotiations, it may, at its sole discretion, terminate
867 negotiations with the proposer. If these negotiations are
868 unsuccessful, the authority may go to the second and lower-
869 ranked firms, in order, using the same procedure. If only one
870 proposal is received, the authority may negotiate in good faith,
871 and if it is not satisfied with the results, it may, at its sole
872 discretion, terminate negotiations with the proposer. The
873 authority may, at its discretion, reject all proposals at any
874 point in the process up to completion of a contract with the
875 proposer.
Page 35 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
876 Section 25. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
877 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
878 reference thereto, section 373.0397, Florida Statutes, is
879 reenacted to read:
880 373.0397 Floridan and Biscayne aquifers; designation of
881 prime groundwater recharge areas.—Upon preparation of an
882 inventory of prime groundwater recharge areas for the Floridan
883 or Biscayne aquifers, but prior to adoption by the governing
884 board, the water management district shall publish a legal
885 notice of public hearing on the designated areas for the
886 Floridan and Biscayne aquifers, with a map delineating the
887 boundaries of the areas, as provided in chapter 50. The notice
888 shall be at least one-fourth page and shall read as follows:
889 NOTICE OF PRIME RECHARGE
890 AREA DESIGNATION
891 The ...(name of taxing authority)... proposes to designate
892 specific land areas as areas of prime recharge to the ...(name
893 of aquifer)... Aquifer.
894 All concerned citizens are invited to attend a public
895 hearing on the proposed designation to be held on ...(date and
896 time)... at ...(meeting place)....
897 A map of the affected areas follows.
898 The governing board of the water management district shall adopt
899 a designation of prime groundwater recharge areas to the
900 Floridan and Biscayne aquifers by rule within 120 days after the
Page 36 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
901 public hearing, subject to the provisions of chapter 120.
902 Section 26. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
903 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
904 reference thereto, section 373.146, Florida Statutes, is
905 reenacted to read:
906 373.146 Publication of notices, process, and papers.—
907 (1) Whenever in this chapter the publication of any
908 notice, process, or paper is required or provided for, unless
909 otherwise provided by law, the publication thereof as provided
910 in chapter 50 is considered as being sufficient.
911 (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
912 contrary, and except in the case of emergency meetings, water
913 management districts may provide reasonable notice of public
914 meetings held to evaluate responses to solicitations issued by
915 the water management district, by publication as provided in
916 chapter 50, no less than 7 days before such meeting.
917 Section 27. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
918 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
919 reference thereto, subsection (12) of section 403.722, Florida
920 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
921 403.722 Permits; hazardous waste disposal, storage, and
922 treatment facilities.—
923 (12) On the same day of filing with the department of an
924 application for a permit for the construction modification, or
925 operation of a hazardous waste facility, the applicant shall
Page 37 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
926 notify each city and county within 1 mile of the facility of the
927 filing of the application and shall publish notice of the filing
928 of the application. The applicant shall publish a second notice
929 of the filing within 14 days after the date of filing. Each
930 notice shall be published as provided in chapter 50 in the
931 county in which the facility is located or is proposed to be
932 located. The notice shall contain:
933 (a) The name of the applicant and a brief description of
934 the project and its location.
935 (b) The location of the application file and when it is
936 available for public inspection.
937
938 The notice shall be prepared by the applicant and shall comply
939 with the following format:
940 Notice of Application
941 The Department of Environmental Protection announces receipt of
942 an application for a permit from ...(name of applicant)... to
943 ...(brief description of project).... This proposed project will
944 be located at ...(location)... in ...(county)... ...(city)....
945 This application is being processed and is available for public
946 inspection during normal business hours, 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m.,
947 Monday through Friday, except legal holidays, at ...(name and
948 address of office)....
949 Section 28. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
950 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
Page 38 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
951 reference thereto, subsection (5) of section 849.38, Florida
952 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
953 849.38 Proceedings for forfeiture; notice of seizure and
954 order to show cause.—
955 (5) If the value of the property seized is shown by the
956 sheriff's return to have an appraised value of $1,000 or less,
957 the above citation shall be served by posting at three public
958 places in the county, one of which shall be the front door of
959 the courthouse; if the value of the property is shown by the
960 sheriff's return to have an approximate value of more than
961 $1,000, the citation shall be published by print or posted for
962 at least 2 consecutive weeks on a publicly accessible website as
963 provided in s. 50.0311. If published in print, the citation
964 shall appear at least once each week for 2 consecutive weeks in
965 a newspaper qualified to publish legal notices under chapter 50
966 that is published in the county, if there is such a newspaper
967 published in the county. If there is no such newspaper, the
968 notice of such publication shall be made by certificate of the
969 clerk if publication is made by posting, and by affidavit as
970 provided in chapter 50, if made by publication as provided in
971 chapter 50, which affidavit or certificate shall be filed and
972 become a part of the record in the cause. Failure of the record
973 to show proof of such publication shall not affect any judgment
974 made in the cause unless it shall affirmatively appear that no
975 such publication was made.
Page 39 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
976 Section 29. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
977 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
978 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (6) of section
979 932.704, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
980 932.704 Forfeiture proceedings.—
981 (6)(a) If the property is required by law to be titled or
982 registered, or if the owner of the property is known in fact to
983 the seizing agency, or if the seized property is subject to a
984 perfected security interest in accordance with the Uniform
985 Commercial Code, chapter 679, the attorney for the seizing
986 agency shall serve the forfeiture complaint as an original
987 service of process under the Florida Rules of Civil Procedure
988 and other applicable law to each person having an ownership or
989 security interest in the property. The seizing agency shall also
990 publish, in accordance with chapter 50, notice of the forfeiture
991 complaint for 2 consecutive weeks on a publicly accessible
992 website or, if published in print, once each week for 2
993 consecutive weeks in a newspaper qualified to publish legal
994 notices under chapter 50 in the county where the seizure
995 occurred.
996 Section 30. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
997 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
998 reference thereto, paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of section
999 1001.372, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
1000 1001.372 District school board meetings.—
Page 40 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1009 2026
1001 (2) PLACE OF MEETINGS.—
1002 (c) For the purpose of this section, due public notice
1003 shall consist of, at least 2 days prior to the meeting:
1004 continuous publication on a publicly accessible website as
1005 provided in s. 50.0311 or the official district school board
1006 website; publication in a newspaper of general circulation in
1007 the county, or in each county where there is no newspaper of
1008 general circulation in the county, an announcement over at least
1009 one radio station whose signal is generally received in the
1010 county, a reasonable number of times daily during the 48 hours
1011 immediately preceding the date of such meeting; or posting a
1012 notice at the courthouse door if no newspaper is published in
1013 the county.
1014 Section 31. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
1015 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a
1016 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 1011.03, Florida
1017 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
1018 1011.03 Public hearings; budget to be submitted to
1019 Department of Education.—
1020 (1) Each district school board shall cause a summary of
1021 its tentative budget, including the proposed millage levies as
1022 provided for by law, to be posted on the district's official
1023 website or on a publicly accessible website as provided in s.
1024 50.0311.
1025 Section 32. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 41 of 41
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1009-02-c2